Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.230

License suspension, revocation—Receivership.

(1) The director may issue an order to suspend, revoke, or condition a license, place a licensee in receivership, revoke the designation of an authorized delegate, compel payment of restitution by a licensee to damaged parties, require affirmative actions as are necessary by a licensee to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, or remove from office or prohibit from participation in the affairs of any authorized delegate or any licensee, or both, any responsible individual, executive officer, person in control, or employee of the licensee, if:

(a) The licensee violates this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter or is convicted of a violation of a state or federal money laundering or terrorism statute;

(b) The licensee does not cooperate with an examination, investigation, or subpoena lawfully issued by the director or the director's designee;

(c) The licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence;

(d) An authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or federal money laundering statute, or violates this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter as a result of the licensee's willful misconduct or deliberate avoidance of knowledge;

(e) The financial condition and responsibility, competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a licensee, or responsible individual of the licensee or authorized delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the person to provide money services;

(f) The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice, or an unfair and deceptive act or practice;

(g) The licensee is insolvent, fails to maintain the required net worth, suspends payment of its obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;

(h) The licensee does not remove an authorized delegate after the director issues and serves upon the licensee a final order including a finding that the authorized delegate has violated this chapter; or

(i) The licensee, its responsible individual, or any of its executive officers or other persons in control of the licensee are listed or become listed on the specially designated nationals and blocked persons list prepared by the United States department of the treasury as a potential threat to commit terrorist acts or to finance terrorist acts.

(2) In determining whether a licensee or other person subject to this chapter is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the licensee's money transmission services, the magnitude of the loss or potential loss to consumers or others, the gravity of the violation of this chapter, any action against the licensee by another state or the federal government, and the previous conduct of the person involved.

(3) The director shall immediately suspend any certification of licensure issued under this chapter if the holder of the certificate has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for certification during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate of licensure shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

[ 2003 c 287 s 25.]